District of Columbia statutes.
2-1933

Written language services by covered entity.

(a)

A covered entity shall provide translations of vital documents into any non-English language spoken by a limited or no-English proficient population that constitutes 3% or 500 individuals, whichever is less, of the population served or encountered, or likely to be served or encountered, by the covered entity in the District of Columbia.

(b)

If the provisions of this subchapter are contractually imposed on a non-covered entity, subsection (a) of this section shall apply.

June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-167, § 4, 51 DCR 4688
This section is referenced in § 6-751.11, § 32-1331.12, § 42-3505.01, and § 50-1401.01.